Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2603v2, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 274, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 2603v2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2603v2. A. Except as otherwise provided for in
subsection B of this section and elsewhere in this section, to be
eligible to participate in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program and to qualify for an award which includes payment of an
amount equivalent to resident tuition or other tuition pursuant to
Section 2604 of this title for the first semester or other academic
unit of postsecondary enrollment, a student shall:
1. Be a resident of this state or be enrolled in a school
district located in this state that serves students who reside in
both this state and an adjacent state pursuant to a contract as
authorized in Section 5-117.1 of this title;
2. Be a United States citizen or lawfully present in the United
States. A student who is not a United States citizen or lawfully
present in the United States shall not be eligible to participate in
the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program and to qualify for an
award notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3242 of this title.
The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any student who
was enrolled in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program prior to
the end of the 2006-2007 school year;
3. Have a record of satisfactory compliance with agreements
executed pursuant to Section 2605 of this title;
4. a. have Have graduated within the previous three (3)
years from a high school accredited by the State Board
of Education or the Oklahoma School of Science and
Mathematics with a minimum 2.5 cumulative grade point
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 2

average on a 4.0 scale for all work attempted in
grades nine through twelve,
b. have Have graduated within the previous three (3)
years from a high school not accredited by the State
Board of Education with a minimum 2.5 cumulative grade
point average on a 4.0 scale for all work attempted in
grades nine through twelve and have achieved a
composite score of 22 or higher on the ACT test, or
c. have Have satisfactorily completed within the previous
three (3) years an educational program that was
provided through a means other than a public or
private school and have achieved a composite score of
22 or higher on the ACT test;
5. Have completed the curricular requirements for admission to
an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.
Students shall also have attained a 2.5 grade point average in the
core curriculum courses. Students who attended a high school which
did not offer all the core curriculum courses or students who were
educated by other means and were not offered all the core curriculum
courses shall be allowed to satisfy this curriculum requirement by
participating in a program approved by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education for remediation of high school curricular
deficiencies;
6. Have satisfied admission standards as determined by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for first-time-entering
students for the appropriate type of institution, or, if attending a
private institution, have satisfied admission standards as
determined by the private institution. No student participating in
the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program shall be admitted into
an institution of higher education by special admission standards;
7. Have secured admission to, and enrolled in, an institution
which is a member of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
a postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by a technology
center school that meets the requirements to be eligible for federal
student financial aid, or a private institution of higher learning
located within this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of
this title; and
8. a. have Have established financial need according to the
provisions of subsection D of Section 2605 of this
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 3

title and standards and provisions promulgated by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education,
b. if If the student was adopted between birth and twelve
(12) years of age while in the permanent custody of
the Department of Human Services, in the court-ordered
custody of a licensed private nonprofit child-placing
agency, or federally recognized Indian tribe, as
defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of
1978, have established financial need according to the
provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection E of Section
2605 of this title and standards and provisions
promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education,
c. if If the student was adopted between thirteen (13)
and seventeen (17) years of age while in the permanent
custody of the Department of Human Services, in the
court-ordered custody of a licensed private nonprofit
child-placing agency, or federally recognized Indian
tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare
Act of 1978, have established financial need according
to the provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection E of
Section 2605 of this title and standards and
provisions promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education, or
d. if If the student was placed in the custody of the
Department of Human Services at any time during the
eighth, ninth, tenth, or eleventh grades grade and
enrolls in the program no later than his or her
official date of high school graduation, have
established financial need according to the provisions
of paragraph 3 of subsection E of Section 2605 of this
title and standards and provisions promulgated by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, or
e. If the student is the child of a certified classroom
teacher and meets the provisions of paragraph 5 of
subsection E of Section 2605 of this title. For the
purposes of this paragraph, “certified classroom
teacher” shall have the same meaning as provided in
subparagraph d of paragraph 5 of subsection E of
Section 2605 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 4

B. 1. A student shall be eligible to participate in the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program and to qualify for an award
which includes payment of an amount equivalent to resident tuition
or other tuition pursuant to Section 2604 of this title for the
first semester or other academic unit of postsecondary enrollment if
the student meets all of the following criteria:
a. is a child of any person killed after January 1, 2000,
in the line of duty in any branch of the United States
Armed Forces or who died after January 1, 2000, as a
result of an injury sustained while in the line of
duty in any branch of the United States Armed Forces
and the person who was killed or died filed an
individual or joint Oklahoma income tax return for the
tax year prior to the year during which the person was
killed or died,
b. is a resident of this state or is enrolled in a school
district located in this state that serves students
who reside in both this state and an adjacent state
pursuant to a contract as authorized in Section 5-
117.1 of this title,
c. enrolls in an institution within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education prior to reaching the age
of twenty-one (21),
d. has satisfied admission standards as determined by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for first-
time-entering students for the appropriate type of
institution, or, if attending a private institution,
has satisfied admission standards as determined by the
private institution. No student participating in the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program shall be
admitted into an institution of higher education by
special admission standards,
e. has secured admission to, and enrolled in, an
institution which is a member of The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education, a postsecondary
vocational-technical program offered by a technology
center school that meets the requirements to be
eligible for federal student financial aid, or a
private institution of higher learning located within
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 5

this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of
this title, and
f. executes an agreement pursuant to subsection C of
Section 2605 of this title.
2. A student who is eligible to participate in the program
pursuant to this subsection shall not be required to meet the
eligibility requirements set forth in subsection A of this section.
C. To retain eligibility while pursuing the program of higher
learning in which enrolled, the student shall:
1. Meet the requirements for retention and degree completion as
established by the institution in which the student is enrolled;
2. Maintain good academic standing and satisfactory academic
progress according to standards of the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education;
3. Maintain satisfactory academic progress as required for
eligibility for federal Title IV student financial aid programs.
The provisions of this paragraph shall become effective for the
2012-2013 school year;
4. Comply with the standards related to maintenance of
eligibility as promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education; and
5. Refrain from conduct that leads to expulsion or suspension
of more than one semester from an institution of higher education.
A student who violates the provisions of this paragraph shall
permanently lose eligibility for program benefits. The provisions
of this paragraph shall become effective January 1, 2008.
D. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the
State Board of Career and Technology Education shall promulgate
rules relating to maintenance of eligibility under the Oklahoma
Higher Learning Access Act by a student.
E. It is the intent of the Legislature that students in the
ninth grade for the 1992-93 school year who are determined to be
eligible Oklahoma Higher Learning Access students pursuant to the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Act shall be the first students
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 6

eligible for benefits from the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Trust
Fund.
F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are
authorized to study, develop, and propose criteria for determining
award eligibility based upon the completion of seven semesters of
high school coursework by a student.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2605, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 274, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2605), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2605. A. Each school year, every fifth- through
eleventh-grade student in the public and private schools of this
state and students who are educated by other means and are in the
equivalent of the fifth through eleventh grade shall be apprised,
together with the parent, custodial parent, or guardian of the
student, of the opportunity for access to higher learning under the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program. The Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education and the State Board of Education shall develop,
promote, and coordinate a public awareness program to be utilized in
making students and parents aware of the Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Program.
B. On a form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, every public school district shall designate at least one
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program contact person, who shall be
a counselor or teacher, at each public school site in this state in
which eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade classes are taught.
When requested by the State Regents, the State Board of Education
shall assist the State Regents to ensure the designation of contact
persons. Private schools shall also designate at least one school
official as a contact person. For students who are educated by
other means, a parent or guardian or other person approved by the
State Regents shall be designated the contact person.
C. 1. Students who qualify on the basis of financial need
according to subsection D or E of this section or who meet the
eligibility qualification set forth in subparagraph a of paragraph 1
of subsection B of Section 2603 of this title prior to entering the
eleventh grade no later than December 31 of their twelfth-grade year
or prior to reaching the age of sixteen (16) seventeen (17) and who
qualify on the basis of the standards and provisions promulgated by
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall be given the
opportunity throughout the eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, and eleventh-
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 7

grade years, and no later than December 31 of the twelfth-grade
year, for students enrolled in a public or private school, or
between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) seventeen (17),
for students who are educated by other means, to enter into
participation in the program by agreeing to, throughout the
remainder of their school years or educational program:
a. attend school or an educational program regularly and
do homework regularly,
b. refrain from substance abuse,
c. refrain from commission of crimes or delinquent acts,
d. have school work and school records reviewed by
mentors designated pursuant to the program,
e. provide information requested by the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education or the State Board of
Education, and
f. participate in program activities.
2. Students who meet the eligibility qualification set forth in
subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 2603 of
this title after completing the eleventh grade December 31 of their
twelfth-grade year or after reaching the age of seventeen (17)
eighteen (18) shall be given the opportunity prior to reaching the
age of twenty-one (21) to enter into participation in the program
and shall execute an agreement with provisions as determined by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
3. The contact person shall maintain the agreements, which
shall be executed on forms provided by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education and managed according to regulations
promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, and
the contact person shall monitor compliance of the student with the
terms of the agreement. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education are authorized to process student agreements and verify
compliance with the agreements. Students failing to comply with the
terms of the agreement shall not be eligible for the awards provided
in Section 2604 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 8

4. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may provide
an exception to the age limits provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of
this subsection pursuant to subsection L of this section.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 5-132 and 5-132.1
of this title, a student who is age twenty-one (21) or older shall
not be eligible to enter into participation in the program.
D. Except as otherwise provided for in subsection E of this
section and except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B
of Section 2603 of this title, a student shall not be found to be in
financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program if:
1. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, or tenth-grade students who
are enrolled in a public or private school or students between the
ages of thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) who are educated by other
means who apply for participation in the program in the 2017-2018
school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s) exceeds Fifty-five Thousand Dollars ($55,000.00) per year;
2. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade
students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students
between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated
by other means who apply for participation in the program in the
2021-2022 school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the
student’s parent(s) exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per
year;
3. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade
students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students
between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated
by other means who apply for participation in the program in the
2022-2023 school year:
a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,
exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,
b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,
exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per
year, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 9

c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,
exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;
4. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade
students or twelfth-grade students no later than December 31 of
their twelfth-grade year who are enrolled in a public or private
school or students between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen
(17) who are educated by other means who apply for participation in
the program in the 2025-2026 school year:
a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,
exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,
b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,
exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per
year, or
c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,
exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;
5. Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, prior to
receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award
for any year during which the student is enrolled in an institution
which is a member of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
a postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by a technology
center school that meets the requirements to be eligible for federal
student financial aid, or a private institution of higher learning
located within this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of
this title, the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s
parent(s) exceeds One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per
year.
The determination of financial qualification as set forth in
this paragraph shall be based on the income of the student, not the
income of the parent(s), if a student:
a. is determined to be independent of the student’s
parents for federal financial aid purposes,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 10

b. was in the permanent custody of the Department of
Human Services at the time the student enrolled in the
program, or
c. was in the court-ordered custody of a federally
recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal
Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, at the time the
student enrolled in the program.
The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to any student who
has received an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit
award after the 2017-2018 school year; and
5. 6. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
review the determination of financial qualification as set forth in
paragraphs 1, 2, and 3, and 4 of this subsection if the income from
taxable and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s) includes
income received from nontaxable military benefits or income received
from the federal Social Security Administration due to the death or
disability of the student’s parent(s). If the income from taxable
and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s), excluding income
received from nontaxable military benefits or income received from
the federal Social Security Administration due to the death or
disability of the student’s parent(s), does not exceed the
limitations set forth by paragraphs 1, 2, and 3, and 4 of this
subsection, the student shall be determined to have met the
financial qualification set forth in paragraphs 1, 2, and 3, and 4
of this subsection.
E. 1. A student who was adopted between birth and twelve (12)
years of age while in the permanent custody of the Department of
Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a licensed private
nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally recognized Indian
tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978,
shall not be found to be in financial need for purposes of the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the time the student
begins postsecondary education and prior to receiving any Oklahoma
Higher Learning Access Program benefit award, the federal adjusted
gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds One Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) per year. The provisions of this
paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the
2012-2013 school year.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 11

2. A student who was adopted between thirteen (13) and
seventeen (17) years of age while in the permanent custody of the
Department of Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a
licensed private nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally
recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child
Welfare Act of 1978, shall not be found to be in financial need for
purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the
time the student begins postsecondary education and prior to
receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award,
the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds
Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) per year. The provisions
of this paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the
2012-2013 school year.
3. A student who was placed in the custody of the Department of
Human Services at any time during the eighth, ninth, tenth, or
eleventh grades grade and enrolls in the program no later than his
or her official date of high school graduation shall not be found to
be in financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Program if the federal adjusted gross income of the student
exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year.
4. Except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B of
Section 2603 of this title, the determination of financial
qualification as set forth in this subsection shall be based on the
income of the student, not the income of the parent(s), if the
student is determined to be independent of the student’s parent(s)
for federal financial aid purposes. A determination of financial
qualification shall not be required for the student who meets the
criteria set forth in this subsection at the time the student
applies for participation in the program. The provisions of this
paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the
2008-2009 school year.
5. a. A student who is the child of a certified classroom
teacher at the time the student applies for
participation in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program shall not be found to be in financial need for
the purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program if, beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or
eleventh-grade students or twelfth-grade students no
later than December 31 of their twelfth-grade year
who are enrolled in a public or private school or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 12

students between thirteen (13) and seventeen (17)
years of age who are educated by other means who apply
for participation in the program in the 2025-2026
school year, the household income of the student's
parent(s) is equal to or greater than seven hundred
percent (700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).
b. Prior to receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program benefit award for any year during which the
student is enrolled in an institution that is a member
of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, a
postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by
a technology center school that meets the eligibility
requirements for federal student financial aid, or a
private institution of higher learning located within
this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of
this title, the household income of the parent(s) of a
student who qualifies pursuant to this paragraph shall
not be equal to or greater than seven hundred percent
(700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).
c. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
verify the full-time employment status of the
student’s parent(s) prior to a student who qualifies
pursuant to this paragraph receiving any Oklahoma
Higher Learning Access Program benefit award.
d. For the purposes of this paragraph, “certified
classroom teacher” means a certified, full-time
classroom teacher who has been employed as a teacher
in a public school district classroom in this state
for a minimum of ten (10) years prior to his or her
child applying for participation in the program. The
teacher is not required to have been employed by the
same public school district for ten (10) consecutive
years. Certified classroom teacher does not mean a
certified teacher who is employed as a school district
superintendent, principal, or any other position
within the administration of a public school district
when his or her child applies for participation in the
program or prior to his or her child receiving any
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award.
F. The financial qualification of a student as set forth in
subsections D and E of this section shall be certified by the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 13

contact person or by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
on the agreement form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education. The form shall be retained in the permanent
record of the student and a copy forwarded to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education.
G. Agreements shall be witnessed by the parent, custodial
parent, or guardian of the student, who shall further agree to:
1. Assist the student in achieving compliance with the
agreements;
2. Confer, when requested to do so, with the school contact
person, other school personnel, and program mentors;
3. Provide information requested by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education or the State Board of Education; and
4. Assist the student in completing forms and reports required
for program participation, making applications to institutions and
schools of higher learning, and filing applications for student
grants and scholarships.
H. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
promulgate rules for the determination of student compliance with
agreements made pursuant to this section.
I. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
designate personnel to coordinate tracking of program records for
the years when students participating in the program are still in
the schools or are being educated by other means, provide staff
development for contact persons in the schools, and provide liaison
with the State Board of Education and local organizations and
individuals participating in the program.
J. The school district where an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program student is enrolled when the student begins participation in
the program and any subsequent school district where the student
enrolls shall forward information regarding participation by the
student in the program to a school to which the student transfers
upon the request of the school for the records of the student.
K. Students participating in the Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Program shall provide their Social Security number or their
student identification number used by their school to the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 14

State Regents for Higher Education. The State Regents shall keep
the numbers confidential and use them only for administrative
purposes.
L. The State Regents may provide an exception to the age limits
provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection C of this section
to a student due to hardship circumstances and allow an application
to the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program for twelfth-grade
students enrolled in a public or private school and students who are
educated by other means and are in the equivalent of twelfth grade.
Provided, however, the exception due to hardship circumstances shall
not apply to:
1. A student enrolled in a public or private school after the
student’s official date of high school graduation;
2. A student educated by other means who is age nineteen (19)
or older; or
3. Any student who is age twenty-one (21) or older.
The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 15

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1727 Page 16